Maryland, session 2026, SB1000.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–207.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(3) (i) “Construction” means:
1. any physical change at a site, including fabrication,
erection, installation, or demolition; or
2. the entry into a binding agreement or contractual
obligation to purchase equipment exclusively for use in construction in the State or to
undertake a program of actual construction in the State which cannot be canceled or
modified without substantial loss to the owner or operator of the proposed generating
station.
(ii) “Construction” does not include a change that is needed for the
temporary use of a site or route for nonutility purposes or for use in securing geological
data, including any boring that is necessary to ascertain foundation conditions.
(b) (3) (i) Except as provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection, unless a
certificate of public convenience and necessity for the construction is first obtained from the
Commission, a person may not begin construction of [an overhead] A transmission line that
is designed to carry a voltage in excess of 69,000 volts or exercise a right of condemnation
with the construction.
(ii) [For] SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, FOR construction related to an existing [overhead] transmission line, the
Commission may waive the requirement in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph for good
cause.
(III) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO
ESTABLISH SPECIFIC CRITERIA FOR MAKING THE DETERMINATION TO WAIVE THE
REQUIREMENT IN SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH FOR GOOD CAUSE,
INCLUDING:
1. THE COST OF THE CONSTRUCTION ON RATEPAYERS;
2. THE IMPACT OF THE CONSTRUCTION ON THE
ENVIRONMENT; AND

SENATE BILL 1000 3
3. ANY OTHER MATTER THE COMMISSION CONSIDERS
APPROPRIATE.
[(iii)] (IV) Notwithstanding subparagraph (i) of this paragraph and
subject to subparagraph [(iv)] (V) of this paragraph, the Commission may issue a certificate
of public convenience and necessity for the construction of [an overhead] A transmission
line only if the applicant for the certificate of public convenience and necessity:
1. is an electric company; or
2. is or, on the start of commercial operation of the
[overhead] transmission line, will be subject to regulation as a public utility by an officer
or an agency of the United States.
[(iv)] (V) The Commission may not issue a certificate of public
convenience and necessity for the construction of [an overhead] A transmission line in the
electric distribution service territory of an electric company to an applicant other than an
electric company if:
1. the [overhead] transmission line is to be located solely
within the electric distribution service territory of that electric company; and
2. the cost of the [overhead] transmission line is to be paid
solely by that electric company and its ratepayers.
[(v)] (VI) 1. This subparagraph applies to the construction of
[an overhead] A transmission line for which a certificate of public convenience and
necessity is required under this section.
2. On issuance of a certificate of public convenience and
necessity for the construction of [an overhead] A transmission line, a person may acquire
by condemnation, in accordance with Title 12 of the Real Property Article, any property or
right necessary for the construction or maintenance of the transmission line.
(4) (i) [Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, for
construction related to an existing overhead transmission line designed to carry a voltage
in excess of 69,000 volts, the Commission shall waive the requirement to obtain a certificate
of public convenience and necessity if the Commission finds that the construction does not:
1. require the person to obtain new real property or
additional rights–of–way through eminent domain; or
2. require larger or higher structures to accommodate:
A. increased voltage; or

SENATE BILL 1000
B. larger conductors.
(ii) 1. For construction related to an existing overhead
transmission line, including repairs, that is necessary to avoid an imminent safety hazard
or reliability risk, a person may undertake the necessary construction] A PERSON MAY
COMPLETE CONSTRUCTION RELATED TO AN EXISTING TRANSMISSION LINE,
INCLUDING REPAIRS, IF THE CONSTRUCTION IS NECESSARY TO AVOID AN IMMINENT
SAFETY HAZARD OR RELIABILITY RISK.
[2.] (II) Within 30 days after construction is completed
under [subsubparagraph 1 of this subparagraph] SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, a person shall file a report with the Commission describing the work that
was completed.
(c) (1) On receipt of an application for a certificate of public convenience and
necessity under this section, the Commission shall provide notice immediately or require
the applicant to provide notice immediately of the application to:
(i) the Department of Planning;
(ii) the governing body, and if applicable the executive, of each
county or municipal corporation in which any portion of the generating station, [overhead]
transmission line, or qualified generator lead line is proposed to be constructed;
(iii) the governing body, and if applicable the executive, of each
county or municipal corporation within 1 mile of the proposed location of the generating
station, [overhead] transmission line, or qualified generator lead line;
(iv) each member of the General Assembly representing any part of
a county in which any portion of the generating station, [overhead] transmission line, or
qualified generator lead line is proposed to be constructed;
(v) each member of the General Assembly representing any part of
each county within 1 mile of the proposed location of the generating station, [overhead]
transmission line, or qualified generator lead line;
(vi) for a proposed [overhead] transmission line, each owner of land
and each owner of adjacent land; and
(vii) all other interested persons.
(2) The Commission, when sending the notice required under paragraph
(1) of this subsection, shall forward a copy of the application to:

SENATE BILL 1000 5
(i) each appropriate State unit and unit of local government for
review, evaluation, and comment regarding the significance of the proposal to State,
area–wide, and local plans or programs; and
(ii) each member of the General Assembly included under paragraph
(1)(iv) and (v) of this subsection who requests a copy of the application.
(3) On receipt of an application for a certificate of public convenience and
necessity under this section, the Commission shall provide notice of the application on the
Commission’s social media platforms and website.
(d) (1) (i) The Commission shall provide an opportunity for public
comment and hold a public hearing on the application for a certificate of public convenience
and necessity in each county and municipal corporation in which any portion of the
construction of a generating station, [an overhead] A transmission line designed to carry a
voltage in excess of 69,000 volts, or a qualified generator lead line is proposed to be located.
(ii) The Commission may hold the public hearing virtually rather
than in person if the Commission provides a comparable opportunity for public comment
and participation in the hearing.
(2) The Commission shall hold the public hearing jointly with the
governing body of the county or municipal corporation in which any portion of the
construction of the generating station, [overhead] transmission line, or qualified generator
lead line is proposed to be located, unless the governing body declines to participate in the
hearing.
(3) (i) Once in each of the 4 successive weeks immediately before the
hearing date, the Commission shall provide weekly notice of the public hearing and an
opportunity for public comment:
1. by advertisement in a newspaper of general circulation in
the county or municipal corporation affected by the application;
2. on two types of social media; and
3. on the Commission’s website.
(ii) Before a public hearing, the Commission shall coordinate with
the governing body of the county or municipal corporation in which any portion of the
construction of the generating station, [overhead] transmission line, or qualified generator
lead line is proposed to be located to identify additional options for providing, in an efficient
and cost–effective manner, notice of the public hearing through other types of media that
are familiar to the residents of the county or municipal corporation.

SENATE BILL 1000
(4) (i) On the day of a public hearing, an informational sign shall be
posted prominently at or near each public entrance of the building in which the public
hearing will be held.
(ii) The informational sign required under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph shall:
1. state the time, room number, and subject of the public
hearing; and
2. be at least 17 by 22 inches in size.
(iii) If the public hearing is conducted virtually rather than in person,
the Commission shall provide information on the hearing prominently on the Commission’s
website.
(5) (i) The Commission shall ensure presentation and
recommendations from each interested State unit, and shall allow representatives of each
State unit to sit during hearing of all parties.
(ii) The Commission shall allow each State unit 15 days after the
conclusion of the hearing to modify the State unit’s initial recommendations.
(e) The Commission shall take final action on an application for a certificate of
public convenience and necessity only after due consideration of:
(1) the recommendation of the governing body of each county or municipal
corporation in which any portion of the construction of the generating station, [overhead]
transmission line, or qualified generator lead line is proposed to be located;
(2) the effect of the generating station, [overhead] transmission line, or
qualified generator lead line on:
(i) the stability and reliability of the electric system;
(ii) economics;
(iii) esthetics;
(iv) historic sites;
(v) WHEN APPLICABLE, aviation safety as determined by the
Maryland Aviation Administration and the administrator of the Federal Aviation
Administration;
(vi) when applicable, air quality and water pollution; and

SENATE BILL 1000 7
(vii) the availability of means for the required timely disposal of
wastes produced by any generating station;
(3) the effect of climate change on the generating station, [overhead]
transmission line, or qualified generator lead line based on the best available scientific
information recognized by the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change;
(4) for a generating station:
(i) the consistency of the application with the comprehensive plan
and zoning of each county or municipal corporation where any portion of the generating
station is proposed to be located;
(ii) the efforts to resolve any issues presented by a county or
municipal corporation where any portion of the generating station is proposed to be located;
(iii) the impact of the generating station on the quantity of annual
and long–term statewide greenhouse gas emissions, measured in the manner specified in §
2–1202 of the Environment Article and based on the best available scientific information
recognized by the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change; and
(iv) the consistency of the application with the State’s climate
commitments for reducing statewide greenhouse gas emissions, including those specified
in Title 2, Subtitle 12 of the Environment Article; and
(5) for a solar energy generating station specified under § 7–218 of this
subtitle, whether the owner of a proposed solar energy generating station complies with
the site requirements under § 7–218(f) of this subtitle.
(f) For the construction of [an overhead] A transmission line, in addition to the
considerations listed in subsection (e) of this section, the Commission shall:
(1) take final action on an application for a certificate of public convenience
and necessity only after due consideration of:
(i) the need to meet existing and future demand for electric service;
and
(ii) for construction related to a new [overhead] transmission line,
the alternative routes that the applicant considered, including the estimated capital and
operating costs of each alternative route and a statement of the reason why the alternative
route was rejected;
(2) require as an ongoing condition of the certificate of public convenience
and necessity that an applicant comply with:

SENATE BILL 1000
(i) all relevant agreements with PJM Interconnection, L.L.C., or its
successors, related to the ongoing operation and maintenance of the [overhead]
transmission line; and
(ii) all obligations imposed by the North America Electric Reliability
Council and the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission related to the ongoing operation
and maintenance of the [overhead] transmission line; and
(3) require the applicant to identify whether the [overhead] transmission
line is proposed to be constructed on:
(i) an existing brownfields site;
(ii) property that is subject to an existing easement; or
(iii) a site where a tower structure or components of a tower structure
used to support an overhead transmission line exist.
(g) (1) The Commission may not authorize, and a person may not undertake,
the construction of an overhead transmission line that is aligned with and within 1 mile of
either end of a public airport runway, unless:
(i) the Federal Aviation Administration determines that the
construction of an overhead transmission line will not constitute a hazard to air navigation;
and
(ii) the Maryland Aviation Administration concurs in that
determination.
(2) A privately owned airport runway shall qualify as a public airport
runway under this subsection only if the runway has been on file with the Federal Aviation
Administration for at least 2 years as being open to the public without restriction.
(h) (1) A county or municipal corporation has the authority to approve or deny
any local permit required under a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued
under this section or a distributed generation certificate of public convenience and necessity
issued under § 7–207.4 of this subtitle.
(2) A county or municipal corporation shall approve or deny any local
permits required under a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued under this
section or a distributed generation certificate of public convenience and necessity issued
under § 7–207.4 of this subtitle:
(i) within a reasonable time; and
(ii) to the extent local laws are not preempted by State law, in
accordance with local laws.

SENATE BILL 1000 9
(3) A county or municipal corporation may not condition the approval of a
local permit required under a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued under
this section or a distributed generation certificate of public convenience and necessity
issued under § 7–207.4 of this subtitle on receipt of any of the following approvals for any
aspect of a generating station, [an overhead] A transmission line, or a qualified lead line
proposed to be constructed under the certificate:
(i) a conditional use approval;
(ii) a special exception approval; or
(iii) a floating zone approval.
Article – Real Property
14–134.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DATA CENTER” MEANS A BUILDING OR GROUP OF BUILDINGS:
(I) USED TO HOUSE COMPUTER SYSTEMS, COMPUTER
STORAGE EQUIPMENT, AND ASSOCIATED INFRASTRUCTURE THAT BUSINESSES OR
OTHER ORGANIZATIONS USE TO ORGANIZE, PROCESS, STORE, AND DISSEMINATE
LARGE AMOUNTS OF DATA;
(II) THAT HAS OR IS PROJECTED TO HAVE AN AGGREGATE
DEMAND OF AT LEAST 5 MEGAWATTS; AND
(III) THAT HAS OR IS PROJECTED TO HAVE A LOAD FACTOR OF
MORE THAN 80%.
(3) “DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT” MEANS AN AREA OR AREAS WITHIN
THE CITY OF BALTIMORE DESIGNATED BY AN ORDINANCE OF THE MAYOR AND CITY
COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE.
(4) “TAX INCREMENT” MEANS FOR ANY TAX YEAR THE AMOUNT BY
WHICH THE ASSESSABLE BASE AS OF JANUARY 1 PRECEDING THAT TAX YEAR
EXCEEDS THE ORIGINAL TAXABLE VALUE, DIVIDED BY THE ASSESSMENT RATIO
USED TO DETERMINE THE ORIGINAL TAXABLE VALUE.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY IN BALTIMORE CITY.

SENATE BILL 1000
(C) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A
PERSON MAY NOT CONSTRUCT A DATA CENTER IN A DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT THAT
IS SUBJECT TO TAX INCREMENT REPAYMENT ON OUTSTANDING BONDS.
(2) THE PROHIBITION IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION DOES
NOT APPLY TO THE CONSTRUCTION OF A DATA CENTER IN THE CITY–WIDE
AFFORDABLE HOUSING DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT ESTABLISHED UNDER
BALTIMORE CITY ORDINANCE NO. 24–443, ENACTED DECEMBER 4, 2024.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.